Oklahoma, session 2026, SB455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-1-105, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-1-105. When used in the Oklahoma Children’s Code,


unless the context otherwise requires:


1. “Abandonment” means:


a. the willful intent by words, actions, or omissions not


to return for a child, or


b. the failure to maintain a significant parental


relationship with a child through visitation or


communication in which incidental or token visits or


communication are not considered significant, or


c. the failure to respond to notice of deprived


proceedings;

Req. No. 135 Page 1


2. “Abuse” means harm or threatened harm to the health, safety,


or welfare of a child by a person responsible for the child’s


health, safety, or welfare, including, but not limited to,


nonaccidental physical or mental injury, sexual abuse, or sexual


exploitation. Provided, however, that nothing contained in the


Oklahoma Children’s Code shall prohibit any parent from using


ordinary force as a means of discipline including, but not limited


to, spanking, switching, or paddling.


a. “Harm or threatened harm to the health or, safety, or


welfare of a child” means any real or threatened


physical, mental, or emotional injury or damage to the


body or mind that is not accidental including, but not


limited to, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation,


neglect, or dependency.


b. “Sexual abuse” includes, but is not limited to, rape,


incest, and lewd or indecent acts or proposals made to


a child, as defined by law, by a person responsible


for the health, safety, or welfare of the child.


c. “Sexual exploitation” includes, but is not limited to,


allowing, permitting, encouraging, or forcing a child


to engage in prostitution, as defined by law, by any


person eighteen (18) years of age or older or by a


person responsible for the health, safety, or welfare


of a child, or allowing, permitting, encouraging, or

Req. No. 135 Page 2


engaging in the lewd, obscene, or pornographic, as


defined by law, photographing, filming, or depicting


of a child in those acts by a person responsible for


the health, safety, and welfare of the child;


3. “Adjudication” means a finding by the court that the


allegations in a petition alleging that a child is deprived are


supported by a preponderance of the evidence;


4. “Adjudicatory hearing” means a hearing by the court as


provided by Section 1-4-601 of this title;


5. “Age-appropriate or developmentally appropriate” means:


a. activities or items that are generally accepted as


suitable for children of the same age or level of


maturity or that are determined to be developmentally


appropriate for a child, based on the development of


cognitive, emotional, physical, and behavioral


capacities that are typical for an age or age group,


and


b. in the case of a specific child, activities or items


that are suitable for that child based on the


developmental stages attained by the child with


respect to the cognitive, emotional, physical, and


behavioral capacities of the specific child.


In the event that any age-related activities have implications


relative to the academic curriculum of a child, nothing in this

Req. No. 135 Page 3


paragraph shall be construed to authorize an officer or employee of


the federal government to mandate, direct, or control a state or


local educational agency, or the specific instructional content,


academic achievement standards and assessments, curriculum, or


program of instruction of a school;


6. “Assessment” means a comprehensive review of child safety


and evaluation of family functioning and protective capacities that


is conducted in response to a child abuse or neglect referral that


does not allege a serious and immediate safety threat to a child;


7. “Behavioral health” means mental health, substance abuse, or


co-occurring mental health and substance abuse diagnoses, and the


continuum of mental health, substance abuse, or co-occurring mental


health and substance abuse treatment;


8. “Child” means any unmarried person under eighteen (18) years


of age;


9. “Child advocacy center” means a center and the


multidisciplinary child abuse team of which it is a member that is


accredited by the National Children’s Alliance or that is completing


a sixth year of reaccreditation. Child advocacy centers shall be


classified, based on the child population of a district attorney’s


district, as follows:


a. nonurban centers in districts with child populations


that are less than sixty thousand (60,000), and



Req. No. 135 Page 4


b. midlevel mid-level nonurban centers in districts with


child populations equal to or greater than sixty


thousand (60,000), but not including Oklahoma and


Tulsa Counties;


10. “Child with a disability” means any child who has a


physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or more


of the major life activities of the child, or who is regarded as


having such an impairment by a competent medical professional;


11. “Child-placing agency” means an agency that arranges for or


places a child in a foster family home, family-style living program,


group home, adoptive home, or a successful adulthood program;


12. “Children’s emergency resource center” means a community-


based program that may provide emergency care and a safe and


structured homelike environment or a host home for children


providing food, clothing, shelter, and hygiene products to each


child served; after-school tutoring; counseling services; life-


skills training; transition services; assessments; family


reunification; respite care; transportation to or from school,


doctors’ appointments, visitations, and other social, school, court,


or other activities when necessary; and a stable environment for


children in crisis who are in custody of the Department of Human


Services if permitted under the Department’s policies and


regulations, or who have been voluntarily placed by a parent or


custodian during a temporary crisis;

Req. No. 135 Page 5


13. “Community-based services” or “community-based programs”


means services or programs which maintain community participation or


supervision in their planning, operation, and evaluation.


Community-based services and programs may include, but are not


limited to, emergency shelter, crisis intervention, group work, case


supervision, job placement, recruitment and training of volunteers,


consultation, medical, educational, home-based services, vocational,


social, preventive and psychological guidance, training, counseling,


early intervention and diversionary substance abuse treatment,


sexual abuse treatment, transitional living, independent living, and


other related services and programs;


14. “Concurrent permanency planning” means, when indicated, the


implementation of two plans for a child entering foster care. One


plan focuses on reuniting the parent and child; the other seeks to


find a permanent out-of-home placement for the child with both plans


being pursued simultaneously;


15. “Court-appointed special advocate” or “CASA” means a


responsible adult volunteer who has been trained and is supervised


by a court-appointed special advocate program recognized by the


court, and when appointed by the court, serves as an officer of the


court in the capacity as a guardian ad litem;


16. “Court-appointed special advocate program” means an


organized program, administered by either an independent, not-for-


profit corporation, a dependent project of an independent, not-for-

Req. No. 135 Page 6


profit corporation, or a unit of local government, which recruits,


screens, trains, assigns, supervises, and supports volunteers to be


available for appointment by the court as guardians ad litem;


17. “Custodian” means an individual other than a parent, legal


guardian, or Indian custodian, to whom legal custody of the child


has been awarded by the court. As used in this title, the term


“custodian” custodian shall not mean the Department of Human


Services;


18. “Day treatment” means a nonresidential program which


provides intensive services to a child who resides in the child’s


own home, the home of a relative, a group home, a foster home, or a


residential child care facility. Day treatment programs include,


but are not limited to, educational services;


19. “Department” means the Department of Human Services;


20. “Dependency” means a child who is homeless or without


proper care or guardianship through no fault of his or her parent,


legal guardian, or custodian;


21. “Deprived child” means a child:


a. who is for any reason destitute, homeless, or


abandoned,


b. who does not have the proper parental care or


guardianship,


c. who has been abused, or neglected, or is dependent,



Req. No. 135 Page 7


d. whose home is an unfit place for the child by reason


of depravity on the part of the parent or legal


guardian of the child, or other person responsible for


the health or welfare of the child,


e. who is a child in need of special care and treatment


because of the child’s physical or mental condition,


and the child’s parents, legal guardian, or other


custodian is unable or willfully fails to provide such


special care and treatment. As used in this


paragraph, a child in need of special care and


treatment includes, but is not limited to, a child who


at birth tests positive for alcohol or a controlled


dangerous substance and who, pursuant to a drug or


alcohol screen of the child and an assessment of the


parent, is determined to be at risk of harm or


threatened harm to the health or, safety, or welfare


of a child,


f. who is a child with a disability deprived of the


nutrition necessary to sustain life or of the medical


treatment necessary to remedy or relieve a life-


threatening medical condition in order to cause or


allow the death of the child if such nutrition or


medical treatment is generally provided to similarly


situated children without a disability or children

Req. No. 135 Page 8


with disabilities; provided that no medical treatment


shall be necessary if, in the reasonable medical


judgment of the attending physician, such treatment


would be futile in saving the life of the child,


g. who, due to improper parental care and guardianship,


is absent from school as specified in Section 10-106


of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, if the child is


subject to compulsory school attendance,


h. whose parent, legal guardian, or custodian for good


cause desires to be relieved of custody,


i. who has been born to a parent whose parental rights to


another child have been involuntarily terminated by


the court and the conditions which led to the making


of the finding, which resulted in the termination of


the parental rights of the parent to the other child,


have not been corrected, or


j. whose parent, legal guardian, or custodian has


subjected another child to abuse or neglect or has


allowed another child to be subjected to abuse or


neglect and is currently a respondent in a deprived


proceeding.


Nothing in the Oklahoma Children’s Code shall be construed to


mean a child is deprived for the sole reason the parent, legal


guardian, or person having custody or control of a child, in good

Req. No. 135 Page 9


faith, selects and depends upon spiritual means alone through


prayer, in accordance with the tenets and practice of a recognized


church or religious denomination, for the treatment or cure of


disease or remedial care of such child.


Evidence of material, educational, or cultural disadvantage as


compared to other children shall not be sufficient to prove that a


child is deprived; the state shall prove that the child is deprived


as defined pursuant to this title.


Nothing contained in this paragraph shall prevent a court from


immediately assuming custody of a child and ordering whatever action


may be necessary, including medical treatment, to protect the


child’s health or welfare;


22. “Dispositional hearing” means a hearing by the court as


provided by Section 1-4-706 of this title;


23. “Drug-endangered child” means a child who is at risk of


suffering physical, psychological, or sexual harm as a result of the


use, possession, distribution, manufacture, or cultivation of


controlled substances, or the attempt of any of these acts, by a


person responsible for the health, safety, or welfare of the child,


as defined in this section. This term includes circumstances


wherein the substance abuse of the person responsible for the


health, safety, or welfare of the child interferes with that


person’s ability to parent and provide a safe and nurturing


environment for the child;

Req. No. 135 Page 10


24. “Emergency custody” means the custody of a child prior to


adjudication of the child following issuance of an order of the


district court pursuant to Section 1-4-201 of this title or


following issuance of an order of the district court pursuant to an


emergency custody hearing, as specified by Section 1-4-203 of this


title;


25. “Facility” means a place, an institution, a building or


part thereof, a set of buildings, or an area whether or not


enclosing a building or set of buildings used for the lawful custody


and treatment of children;


26. “Failure to protect” means failure to take reasonable


action to remedy or prevent child abuse or neglect, and includes the


conduct of a nonabusing parent or guardian who knows the identity of


the abuser or the person neglecting the child, but lies, conceals,


or fails to report the child abuse or neglect or otherwise take


reasonable action to end the abuse or neglect;


27. “Family-style living program” means a residential program


providing sustained care and supervision to residents in a homelike


environment not located in a building used for commercial activity;


28. “Felt safety” means the individual experiences safety by


not anticipating harm or hurt, emotionally or physically, based on


his or her present internal response and environment, and has


relational security from his or her primary caregivers;



Req. No. 135 Page 11


29. “Foster care” or “foster care services” means continuous


twenty-four-hour care and supportive services provided for a child


in foster placement including, but not limited to, the care,


supervision, guidance, and rearing of a foster child by the foster


parent;


29. 30. “Foster family home” means the private residence of a


foster parent who provides foster care services to a child. Such


term shall include a nonkinship foster family home, a therapeutic


foster family home, or the home of a relative or other kinship care


home;


30. 31. “Foster parent eligibility assessment” includes a


criminal background investigation including, but not limited to, a


national criminal history records search based upon the submission


of fingerprints, home assessments, and any other assessment required


by the Department of Human Services, the Office of Juvenile Affairs,


or any child-placing agency pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Child Care Facilities Licensing Act;


31. 32. “Group home” means a residential facility licensed by


the Department to provide full-time care and community-based


services for more than five but fewer than thirteen children;


33. “Guardian ad litem” means a person appointed by the court


pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-4-306 of this title having


those duties and responsibilities as set forth in that section. The


term “guardian ad litem” guardian ad litem shall refer to a court-

Req. No. 135 Page 12


appointed special advocate as well as to any other person appointed


pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-4-306 of this title to serve


as a guardian ad litem;


32. 34. “Guardian ad litem of the estate of the child” means a


person appointed by the court to protect the property interests of a


child pursuant to Section 1-8-108 of this title;


33. “Group home” means a residential facility licensed by the


Department to provide full-time care and community-based services


for more than five but fewer than thirteen children;


34. 35. “Harm or threatened harm to the health or, safety, or


welfare of a child” means any real or threatened physical, mental,


or emotional injury or damage to the body or mind that is not


accidental including, but not limited to, sexual abuse, sexual


exploitation, neglect, or dependency;


35. 36. “Heinous and shocking abuse” includes, but is not


limited to, aggravated physical abuse that results in serious


bodily, mental, or emotional injury. “Serious bodily injury” means


injury that involves:


a. a substantial risk of death,


b. extreme physical pain,


c. protracted disfigurement,


d. a loss or impairment of the function of a body member,


organ, or mental faculty,



Req. No. 135 Page 13


e. an injury to an internal or external organ or the


body,


f. a bone fracture,


g. sexual abuse or sexual exploitation,


h. chronic abuse including, but not limited to, physical,


emotional, or sexual abuse, or sexual exploitation


which is repeated or continuing,


i. torture that includes, but is not limited to,


inflicting, participating in, or assisting in


inflicting intense physical or emotional pain upon a


child repeatedly over a period of time for the purpose


of coercing or terrorizing a child or for the purpose


of satisfying the craven, cruel, or prurient desires


of the perpetrator or another person, or


j. any other similar aggravated circumstance;


36. 37. “Heinous and shocking neglect” includes, but is not


limited to:


a. chronic neglect that includes, but is not limited to,


a persistent pattern of family functioning in which


the caregiver has not met or sustained the basic needs


of a child which results in harm to the child,


b. neglect that has resulted in a diagnosis of the child


as a failure to thrive,



Req. No. 135 Page 14


c. an act or failure to act by a parent that results in


the death or near death of a child or sibling, serious


physical or emotional harm, sexual abuse, or sexual


exploitation, or presents an imminent risk of serious


harm to a child, or


d. any other similar aggravating circumstance;


37. 38. “Individualized service plan” means a document written


pursuant to Section 1-4-704 of this title that has the same meaning


as “service plan” or “treatment plan” where those terms are used in


the Oklahoma Children’s Code;


38. 39. “Infant” means a child who is twelve (12) months of age


or younger;


39. 40. “Institution” means a residential facility offering


care and treatment for more than twenty residents;


40. 41. a. “Investigation” means a response to an


allegation of abuse or neglect that involves a serious


and immediate threat to the safety of the child,


making it necessary to determine:


(1) the current safety of a child and the risk of


subsequent abuse or neglect, and


(2) whether child abuse or neglect occurred and


whether the family needs prevention- and


intervention-related services.



Req. No. 135 Page 15


b. “Investigation” Investigation results in a written


response stating one of the following findings:


(1) “substantiated” means the Department has


determined, after an investigation of a report of


child abuse or neglect and based upon some


credible evidence, that child abuse or neglect


has occurred. When child abuse or neglect is


substantiated, the Department may recommend:


(a) court intervention if the Department finds


the health, safety, or welfare of the child


is threatened, or


(b) child abuse and neglect prevention- and


intervention-related services for the child,


parents, or persons responsible for the care


of the child if court intervention is not


determined to be necessary,


(2) “unsubstantiated” means the Department has


determined, after an investigation of a report of


child abuse or neglect, that insufficient


evidence exists to fully determine whether child


abuse or neglect has occurred. If child abuse or


neglect is unsubstantiated, the Department may


recommend, when determined to be necessary, that


the parents or persons responsible for the care

Req. No. 135 Page 16


of the child obtain child abuse and neglect


prevention- and intervention-related services, or


(3) “ruled out” means a report in which a child


protective services specialist has determined,


after an investigation of a report of child abuse


or neglect, that no child abuse or neglect has


occurred;


41. 42. “Kinship care” means full-time care of a child by a


kinship relation;


42. 43. “Kinship guardianship” means a permanent guardianship


as defined in this section;


43. 44. “Kinship relation” or “kinship relationship” means


relatives, stepparents, or other responsible adults who have a bond


or tie with a child and/or or to whom has been ascribed a family


relationship role with the child’s parents or the child; provided,


however, in cases where the Indian Child Welfare Act applies, the


definitions contained in 25 U.S.C., Section 1903 shall control;


44. 45. “Mental health facility” means a mental health or


substance abuse treatment facility as defined by the Inpatient


Mental Health and Substance Abuse Treatment of Minors Act;


45. 46. “Minor” means the same as the term “child” child as


defined in this section;





Req. No. 135 Page 17


46. 47. “Minor in need of treatment” means a child in need of


mental health or substance abuse treatment as defined by the


Inpatient Mental Health and Substance Abuse Treatment of Minors Act;


47. 48. “Multidisciplinary child abuse team” means any team


established pursuant to Section 1-9-102 of this title of three or


more persons who are trained in the prevention, identification,


investigation, prosecution, and treatment of physical and sexual


child abuse and who are qualified to facilitate a broad range of


prevention- and intervention-related services and services related


to child abuse. For purposes of this definition, “freestanding”


means a team not used by a child advocacy center for its


accreditation;


48. 49. “Near death” means a child is in serious or critical


condition, as certified by a physician, as a result of abuse or


neglect;


49. 50. a. “Neglect” means:


(1) the failure or omission to provide any of the


following:


(a) adequate nurturance and affection, food,


clothing, shelter, sanitation, hygiene, or


appropriate education,


(b) medical, dental, or behavioral health care,


(c) supervision or appropriate caretakers to


protect the child from harm or threatened

Req. No. 135 Page 18


harm of which any reasonable and prudent


person responsible for the child’s health,


safety, or welfare would be aware, or


(d) special care made necessary for the child’s


health and safety by the physical or mental


condition of the child,


(2) the failure or omission to protect a child from


exposure to any of the following:


(a) the use, possession, sale, or manufacture of


illegal drugs,


(b) illegal activities, or


(c) sexual acts or materials that are not age-


appropriate, or


(3) abandonment.


b. “Neglect” Neglect shall not mean a child who engages


in independent activities, except if the person


responsible for the child’s health, safety, or welfare


willfully disregards any harm or threatened harm to


the child, given the child’s level of maturity,


physical condition, or mental abilities. Such


independent activities include, but are not limited


to:


(1) traveling to and from school including by


walking, running, or bicycling,

Req. No. 135 Page 19


(2) traveling to and from nearby commercial or


recreational facilities,


(3) engaging in outdoor play,


(4) remaining at home unattended for a reasonable


amount of time,


(5) remaining in a vehicle if the temperature inside


the vehicle is not or will not become dangerously


hot or cold, except under the conditions


described in Section 11-1119 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, or


(6) engaging in similar activities alone or with


other children.


Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to mean a child is


abused or neglected for the sole reason the parent, legal guardian,


or person having custody or control of a child, in good faith,


selects and depends upon spiritual means alone through prayer, in


accordance with the tenets and practice of a recognized church or


religious denomination, for the treatment or cure of disease or


remedial care of such child. Nothing contained in this paragraph


shall prevent a court from immediately assuming custody of a child,


pursuant to the Oklahoma Children’s Code, and ordering whatever


action may be necessary, including medical treatment, to protect the


child’s health or welfare;



Req. No. 135 Page 20


50. 51. “Permanency hearing” means a hearing by the court


pursuant to Section 1-4-811 of this title;


51. 52. “Permanent custody” means the court-ordered custody of


an adjudicated deprived child when a parent-child relationship no


longer exists due to termination of parental rights or due to the


death of a parent or parents;


52. 53. “Permanent guardianship” means a judicially created


relationship between a child, a kinship relation of the child, or


other adult established pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-4-


709 of this title;


53. 54. “Person responsible for a child’s health, safety, or


welfare” includes a parent; a legal guardian; custodian; a foster


parent; a person eighteen (18) years of age or older with whom the


child’s parent cohabitates or any other adult residing in the home


of the child; an agent or employee of a public or private


residential home, institution, facility, or day treatment program as


defined in Section 175.20 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or


an owner, operator, or employee of a child care facility as defined


by Section 402 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


54. 55. “Plan of safe care” means a plan developed for an


infant with Neonatal Abstinence Syndrome or a Fetal Alcohol Spectrum


Disorder upon release from the care of a health care provider that


addresses the health and substance use treatment needs of the infant


and mother or caregiver;

Req. No. 135 Page 21


55. 56. “Protective custody” means custody of a child taken by


a law enforcement officer or designated employee of the court


without a court order;


56. 57. “Putative father” means an alleged father as that term


is defined in Section 7700-102 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


57. 58. “Qualified residential treatment program” means a


program that:


a. has a trauma-informed treatment model that is designed


to address the needs including clinical needs as


appropriate, of children with serious emotional or


behavioral disorders or disturbances and, with respect


to a child, is able to implement the treatment


identified for the child from a required assessment,


b. has registered or licensed nursing staff and other


licensed clinical staff who:


(1) provide care within the scope of their practice


as defined by the laws of this state,


(2) are on-site according to the treatment model


referred to in subparagraph a of this paragraph,


and


(3) are available twenty-four (24) hours a day and


seven (7) days a week,





Req. No. 135 Page 22


c. to the extent appropriate, and in accordance with the


child’s best interest, facilitates participation of


family members in the child’s treatment program,


d. facilitates outreach to the family members of the


child including siblings, documents how the outreach


is made including contact information, and maintains


contact information for any known biological family of


the child,


e. documents how family members are integrated into the


treatment process for the child including post-


discharge, and how sibling connections are maintained,


f. provides discharge planning and family-based aftercare


support for at least six (6) months post-discharge,


and


g. is licensed and accredited by any of the following


independent, not-for-profit organizations:


(1) The the Commission on Accreditation of


Rehabilitation Facilities (CARF),


(2) The the Joint Commission on Accreditation of


Healthcare Organizations (JCAHO),


(3) The the Council on Accreditation (COA), or


(4) any other federally approved independent, not-


for-profit accrediting organization;



Req. No. 135 Page 23


58. 59. “Reasonable and prudent parent standard” means the


standard characterized by careful and sensible parental decisions


that maintain the health, safety, and best interests of a child


while at the same time encouraging the emotional and developmental


growth of the child. This standard shall be used by the child’s


caregiver when determining whether to allow a child to participate


in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities.


For purposes of this definition, the term “caregiver” means a foster


parent with whom a child in foster care has been placed, a


representative of a group home where a child has been placed, or a


designated official for a residential child care facility where a


child in foster care has been placed;


59. 60. “Relative” means a grandparent, great-grandparent,


brother or sister of whole or half blood, aunt, uncle, or any other


person related to the child;


60. 61. “Residential child care facility” means a twenty-four-


hour residential facility where children live together with or are


supervised by adults who are not their parents or relatives;


61. 62. “Review hearing” means a hearing by the court pursuant


to Section 1-4-807 of this title;


62. 63. “Risk” means the likelihood that an incident of child


abuse or neglect will occur in the future;


63. “Safety threat” means the threat of serious harm due to


child abuse or neglect occurring in the present or in the very near

Req. No. 135 Page 24


future and without the intervention of another person, a child would


likely or in all probability sustain severe or permanent disability


or injury, illness, or death;


64. “Safety analysis” means action taken by the Department in


response to a report of alleged child abuse or neglect that may


include an assessment or investigation based upon an analysis of the


information received according to priority guidelines and other


criteria adopted by the Department;


65. “Safety evaluation” means evaluation of a child’s situation


by the Department using a structured, evidence-based tool to


determine if the child is subject to a safety threat related to the


child’s physical, developmental, medical, mental, felt safety, or


educational needs;


66. “Safety threat” means the threat of serious harm due to


child abuse or neglect occurring in the present or in the very near


future and without the intervention of another person, a child would


likely or in all probability sustain severe or permanent disability


or injury, mental or physical illness, or death;


67. “Secure facility” means a facility which is designed and


operated to ensure that all entrances and exits from the facility


are subject to the exclusive control of the staff of the facility,


whether or not the juvenile being detained has freedom of movement


within the perimeter of the facility, or a facility which relies on



Req. No. 135 Page 25


locked rooms and buildings, fences, or physical restraint in order


to control behavior of its residents;


67. 68. “Sibling” means a biologically or legally related


brother or sister of a child. This includes including an individual


who satisfies at least one of the following conditions with respect


to a child:


a. the individual is considered by state law to be a


sibling of the child, or


b. the individual would have been considered a sibling


under state law but for a termination or other


disruption of parental rights, such as the death of a


parent;


68. 69. “Specialized foster care” means foster care provided to


a child in a foster home or agency-contracted home which:


a. has been certified by the Developmental Disabilities


Services Division of the Department of Human Services,


b. is monitored by the Division, and


c. is funded through the Home- Home and Community-Based


Waiver Services Program administered by the Division;


69. 70. “Successful adulthood program” means a program


specifically designed to assist a child to enhance those skills and


abilities necessary for successful adult living. A successful


adulthood program may include, but shall not be limited to, such


features as minimal direct staff supervision, and the provision of

Req. No. 135 Page 26


supportive services to assist children with activities necessary for


finding an appropriate place of residence, completing an education


or vocational training, obtaining employment, or obtaining other


similar services;


70. 71. “Temporary custody” means court-ordered custody of an


adjudicated deprived child;


71. 72. “Therapeutic foster family home” means a foster family


home which provides specific treatment services, pursuant to a


therapeutic foster care contract, which are designed to remedy


social and behavioral problems of a foster child residing in the


home;


72. 73. “Trafficking in persons” means sex trafficking or


severe forms of trafficking in persons as described in Section 7102


of Title 22 of the United States Code:


a. “sex trafficking” means the recruitment, harboring,


transportation, provision, obtaining, patronizing, or


soliciting of a person for the purpose of a commercial


sex act, and


b. “severe forms of trafficking in persons” means:


(1) sex trafficking in which a commercial sex act is


induced by force, fraud, or coercion, or in which


the person induced to perform such act has not


attained eighteen (18) years of age, or



Req. No. 135 Page 27


(2) the recruitment, harboring, transportation,


provision, obtaining, patronizing, or soliciting


of a person for labor or services, through the


use of force, fraud, or coercion for the purpose


of subjection to involuntary servitude, peonage,


debt bondage, or slavery;


73. 74. “Transitional living program” means a residential


program that may be attached to an existing facility or operated


solely for the purpose of assisting children to develop the skills


and abilities necessary for successful adult living. The program


may include, but shall not be limited to, reduced staff supervision,


vocational training, educational services, employment and employment


training, and other appropriate independent living skills training


as a part of the transitional living program; and


74. 75. “Voluntary foster care placement” means the temporary


placement of a child by the parent, legal guardian, or custodian of


the child in foster care pursuant to a signed placement agreement


between the Department or a child-placing agency and the child’s


parent, legal guardian, or custodian.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-135 DC 1/19/2025 5:36:43 AM





Req. No. 135 Page 28